Illinois, session 104th, HB787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act is 5amended by changing Section 9 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 45/9)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73.109)7    Sec. 9. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act".9(Source: P.A. 83-464.)